Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. DEPARTMENT OF STATE HEALTH SERVICES

CHAPTER 11. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 11.001. DEFINITIONS. In this title:

(1) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of state health services.

(3) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(4) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 747, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0003, eff. April 2, 2015.